Wyoming, session 2025, HB0101.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 36-1-601 is created to read:

ARTICLE 6
FOREST HEALTH GRANT PROGRAM

36-1-601. Forest health grant program; duties of
state forester; account created; attorney general approval.
HB0101

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0401

(a) There is created the forest health grant program.
The grant program shall be administered by the state
forester, who shall establish the application process and
any other requirements of the grant program not otherwise
provided by this section.

(b) Grants under the forest health grant program
shall pay for not more than seventy-five percent (75%) of
the cost of a forest health project. Any other source of
funds, cash or in-kind contributions may be used as
matching funds to cover the remainder of a project's costs
and the state forester may require that matching funds be
obligated to pay for a portion of any project. Forest
health projects eligible for grant funding under this
section shall be conducted on state, local government or
private land and shall be designed to accomplish one (1) or
more of the following:

(i) Enhancement of water yield or quality;

(ii) Reduction of the risk of catastrophic
wildfire damage;
HB0101

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0401

(iii) Increase production of forest products;

(iv) Improvement of habitat conditions for
wildlife and livestock;

(v) Any other project that is beneficial to
forest health, that is substantially beneficial to the
interest of the state and that has a public purpose as
determined by the state forester.

(c) No forest health grant shall be made without the
written opinion of the attorney general certifying the
legality of the grant and all documents connected with the
grant and project.

(d) There is created the forest health grant program
account. The account shall consist of those funds
designated to the account by law. Funds in the account
shall be used for grants authorized to be made under this
article. Individuals and other entities may also grant,
give, transfer, bequest or donate funds to the account. Any
funds remaining in this account at the end of any fiscal
HB0101

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0401
year shall not lapse or revert as provided by W.S. 9-4-207
but shall remain in the account and be used to implement
the purposes of this article. Accrued interest and other
earnings on unexpended funds within the forest health grant
program account shall be credited to the account.

(e) The state forester shall annually report to the
joint agriculture, state and public lands and water
resources interim committee not later than September 1 on
all grants awarded under this section including the amounts
of the grants and the projects the grants were authorized
to fund.

(f) No forest grants under this section shall be
approved after July 1, 2029 and any unobligated funds
remaining in the forest health grant program account on
July 1, 2029 shall:

(i) If the source of the funds were not state
funds, be returned to the individual or other entity that
granted, gave, transferred, bequeathed or donated the funds
pursuant to subsection (d) of this section; or

HB0101

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0401
(ii) If the source of the funds were state
funds, revert to the general fund or other state fund from
which the funds were initially appropriated.

Section 2. There is appropriated three million
dollars ($3,000,000.00) from the general fund to the forest
health grant program account for purposes of implementing
this act and making grants authorized by this act. This
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose without further legislative authorization.
Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207,
this appropriation shall remain in effect and not lapse or
revert at the end of any fiscal period except upon further
legislative action. It is the intent of the legislature
that additional funding for this purpose be included in the
state forester's next budget request submitted under W.S.
9-2-1013.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0101